Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202561-204
Rules and regulations.

(1) The Chief Water Officer of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the duties of the Chief Water Officer except to the extent such power is statutorily granted to the Nebraska Natural Resources Commission. The Chief Water Officer shall administer rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission.

(2) The rules, regulations, and orders of the Director of Water Resources, the Department of Water Resources, the Nebraska Natural Resources Commission, the Director of Natural Resources, and the Department of Natural Resources shall remain in effect unless changed or eliminated by the Chief Water Officer or the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment, as determined by their respective duties or by the commission to the extent such power is statutorily granted to the commission.

Laws 1957, c. 365, § 22, p. 1241;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-704;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 330.